fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX iK Y 42
SFX iK querir querir/n'q'd'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querant/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir quis/L'D'Q' querir
SFX iK querir quise/L'D'Q' querir
SFX iK querir quises/D'Q' querir
SFX iK querir quiers/n'q'j'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir quiert/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querons/n'q'l't' querir
SFX iK querir querez/n'q'l'm' querir
SFX iK querir quierent/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querais/n'q'j'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir querait/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querions/n'q'l't' querir
SFX iK querir queriez/n'q'l'm' querir
SFX iK querir queraient/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir quis/n'q'j'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir quit/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir quimes/n'q'l't' querir
SFX iK querir quites/n'q'l'm' querir
SFX iK querir quirent/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querrai/n'q'j'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir querras/n'q'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir querra/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querrons/n'q'l't' querir
SFX iK querir querrez/n'q'l'm' querir
SFX iK querir querront/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querrais/n'q'j'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir querrait/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir querrions/n'q'l't' querir
SFX iK querir querriez/n'q'l'm' querir
SFX iK querir querraient/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir quiere/n'q'j'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir quieres/n'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir quisse/n'q'j'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir quisses/n'q'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir quit/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir quissions/n'q'l't' querir
SFX iK querir quissiez/n'q'l'm' querir
SFX iK querir quissent/n'q'l'm't's' querir
SFX iK querir quiers/n'l'm't' querir
SFX iK querir querons/n'l' querir
SFX iK querir querez/n'l'm' querir

SFX iM Y 42
SFX iM querir querir/m't's' querir
SFX iM querir querant/m't's' querir
SFX iM querir quis/L'D'Q' querir
SFX iM querir quise/L'D'Q' querir
SFX iM querir quises/D'Q' querir
SFX iM querir quiers/m't' querir
SFX iM querir quiert/s' querir
SFX iM querir querons querir
SFX iM querir querez querir
SFX iM querir quierent/s' querir
SFX iM querir querais/m't' querir
SFX iM querir querait/s' querir
SFX iM querir querions querir
SFX iM querir queriez querir
SFX iM querir queraient/s' querir
SFX iM querir quis/m't' querir
SFX iM querir quit/s' querir
SFX iM querir quimes querir
SFX iM querir quites querir
SFX iM querir quirent/s' querir
SFX iM querir querrai/m' querir
SFX iM querir querras/t' querir
SFX iM querir querra/s' querir
SFX iM querir querrons querir
SFX iM querir querrez querir
SFX iM querir querront/s' querir
SFX iM querir querrais/m't' querir
SFX iM querir querrait/s' querir
SFX iM querir querrions querir
SFX iM querir querriez querir
SFX iM querir querraient/s' querir
SFX iM querir quiere/m's' querir
SFX iM querir quieres/t' querir
SFX iM querir quisse/m' querir
SFX iM querir quisses/t' querir
SFX iM querir quit/s' querir
SFX iM querir quissions querir
SFX iM querir quissiez querir
SFX iM querir quissent/s' querir
SFX iM querir quiers/t' querir
SFX iM querir querons querir
SFX iM querir querez querir

SFX iN N 40
SFX iN uir uyant fuir
SFX iN uir ui fuir
SFX iN uir uis fuir
SFX iN uir uie fuir
SFX iN uir uies fuir
SFX iN uir uis fuir
SFX iN uir uit fuir
SFX iN uir uyons fuir
SFX iN uir uyez fuir
SFX iN uir uient fuir
SFX iN uir uyais fuir
SFX iN uir uyait fuir
SFX iN uir uyions fuir
SFX iN uir uyiez fuir
SFX iN uir uyaient fuir
SFX iN uir uimes fuir
SFX iN uir uites fuir
SFX iN uir uirent fuir
SFX iN uir uirai fuir
SFX iN uir uiras fuir
SFX iN uir uira fuir
SFX iN uir uirons fuir
SFX iN uir uirez fuir
SFX iN uir uiront fuir
SFX iN uir uirais fuir
SFX iN uir uirait fuir
SFX iN uir uirions fuir
SFX iN uir uiriez fuir
SFX iN uir uiraient fuir
SFX iN uir uie fuir
SFX iN uir uies fuir
SFX iN uir uisse fuir
SFX iN uir uisses fuir
SFX iN uir uit fuir
SFX iN uir uissions fuir
SFX iN uir uissiez fuir
SFX iN uir uissent fuir
SFX iN uir uis fuir
SFX iN uir uyons fuir
SFX iN uir uyez fuir

SFX iO Y 41
SFX iO fuir fuir/m't's' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyant/m't's' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fui/L'D'Q' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuis/D'Q' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuie/L'D'Q' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuies/D'Q' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuis/m't' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuit/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyons enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyez enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuient/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyais/m't' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyait/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyions enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyiez enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyaient/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuimes enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuites enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirent/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirai/m' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiras/t' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuira/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirons enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirez enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiront/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirais/m't' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirait/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuirions enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiriez enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuiraient/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuie/m's' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuies/t' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuisse/m' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuisses/t' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuit/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuissions enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuissiez enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuissent/s' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuis/t' enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyons enfuir
SFX iO fuir fuyez enfuir

SFX iP N 42
SFX iP ourir ourant mourir
SFX iP ourir ort mourir
SFX iP ourir orts mourir
SFX iP ourir orte mourir
SFX iP ourir ortes mourir
SFX iP ourir eurs mourir
SFX iP ourir eurt mourir
SFX iP ourir ourons mourir
SFX iP ourir ourez mourir
SFX iP ourir eurent mourir
SFX iP ourir ourais mourir
SFX iP ourir ourait mourir
SFX iP ourir ourions mourir
SFX iP ourir ouriez mourir
SFX iP ourir ouraient mourir
SFX iP ourir ourus mourir
SFX iP ourir ourut mourir
SFX iP ourir ourûmes mourir
SFX iP ourir ourûtes mourir
SFX iP ourir oururent mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrai mourir
SFX iP ourir ourras mourir
SFX iP ourir ourra mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrons mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrez mourir
SFX iP ourir ourront mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrais mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrait mourir
SFX iP ourir ourrions mourir
SFX iP ourir ourriez mourir
SFX iP ourir ourraient mourir
SFX iP ourir eure mourir
SFX iP ourir eures mourir
SFX iP ourir ourusse mourir
SFX iP ourir ourusses mourir
SFX iP ourir ourût mourir
SFX iP ourir ourussions mourir
SFX iP ourir ourussiez mourir
SFX iP ourir ourussent mourir
SFX iP ourir eurs mourir
SFX iP ourir ourons mourir
SFX iP ourir ourez mourir

SFX iQ N 42
SFX iQ ouillir ouillant bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouilli bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillis bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillie bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillies bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ous bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir out bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillons bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillez bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillent bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillais bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillait bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillions bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliez bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillaient bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillis bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillit bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillimes bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillites bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirent bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirai bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliras bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillira bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirons bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirez bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliront bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirais bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirait bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillirions bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliriez bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouilliraient bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouille bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouilles bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillisse bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillisses bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillit bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissions bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissiez bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillissent bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ous bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillons bouillir
SFX iQ ouillir ouillez bouillir

SFX iR Y 41
SFX iR ueillir ueillir/n'q'd'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillant/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueilli/L'D'Q' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillis/D'Q' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillie/L'D'Q' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillies/D'Q' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueille/n'q'j'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueilles/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillons/n'q'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillez/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillent/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillais/n'q'j'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillait/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillions/n'q'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueilliez/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillaient/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillis/n'q'j'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillit/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillimes/n'q'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillites/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillirent/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillerai/n'q'j'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueilleras/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillera/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillerons/n'q'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillerez/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueilleront/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillerais/n'q'j'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillerait/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillerions/n'q'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueilleriez/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueilleraient/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillisse/n'q'j'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillisses/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillit/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillissions/n'q'l't' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillissiez/n'q'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillissent/n'q'l'm't's' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueille/n'l'm' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillons/n'l' cueillir
SFX iR ueillir ueillez/n'l'm' cueillir

SFX iS N 37
SFX iS aillir aillant aillir
SFX iS aillir ailli aillir
SFX iS aillir aille aillir
SFX iS aillir ailles aillir
SFX iS aillir aillons aillir
SFX iS aillir aillez aillir
SFX iS aillir aillent aillir
SFX iS aillir aillais aillir
SFX iS aillir aillait aillir
SFX iS aillir aillions aillir
SFX iS aillir ailliez aillir
SFX iS aillir aillaient aillir
SFX iS aillir aillis aillir
SFX iS aillir aillit aillir
SFX iS aillir aillimes aillir
SFX iS aillir aillites aillir
SFX iS aillir aillirent aillir
SFX iS aillir aillirai aillir
SFX iS aillir ailliras aillir
SFX iS aillir aillira aillir
SFX iS aillir aillirons aillir
SFX iS aillir aillirez aillir
SFX iS aillir ailliront aillir
SFX iS aillir aillirais aillir
SFX iS aillir aillirait aillir
SFX iS aillir aillirions aillir
SFX iS aillir ailliriez aillir
SFX iS aillir ailliraient aillir
SFX iS aillir aillisse aillir
SFX iS aillir aillisses aillir
SFX iS aillir aillit aillir
SFX iS aillir aillissions aillir
SFX iS aillir aillissiez aillir
SFX iS aillir aillissent aillir
SFX iS aillir aille aillir
SFX iS aillir aillons aillir
SFX iS aillir aillez aillir
